Louisiana, session 2026, HB1085.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2054(B)(8) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2054. Air quality control; secretary of environmental quality; powers and duties
* * *
B. The secretary shall have the following powers and duties:
* * *
(8) To establish and implement a program for the control and abatement of
motor vehicle emissions in accordance with R.S. 30:2060 and other applicable state
and federal laws, particularly the Clean Air Act as amended, but not to exceed the
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
requirements provided in such act unless specifically authorized. Such program shall
be applicable only in parishes and municipalities as necessary to comply with the
requirements of the federal Clean Air Act or regulations promulgated by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency. If such program includes the periodic
inspection of motor vehicles, the frequency of performing such inspections shall be
as allowed by federal law or regulations or by agreements with federal agencies.
During each calendar year, the secretary may exempt vehicles of that model year and
vehicles from prior model years from on-board diagnostic (OBD II) testing. The fees
due the department for this program pursuant to R.S. 32:1306(C)(3) R.S.
32:1306(C)(2) shall be deposited into the Environmental Trust Dedicated Fund
Account.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 32:357, 1301, 1302, 1304, 1306(C) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 32:1304.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§357. Windshields required
A. Every passenger vehicle, other than a motorcycle, and every motor truck
or truck tractor, and every authorized emergency vehicle shall be equipped with an
adequate windshield.
B. Every noncommercial vehicle registered in this state shall be required to
maintain the integrity and condition of the windshield. The standards for
windshields are as follows:
(1) In the eight and one-half inch by eleven inch "acute area" directly in the
driver's line of vision there shall be no cracks and there shall be no more than two
stars, nicks, chips, bullseyes, or half-moons in excess of one-half inch.
(2) In the "critical area" cleaned by the normal sweep of the windshield
wiper blade on the driver's side of the windshield there shall be no star which is
larger than two inches in diameter; there shall be no more than two stars larger than
one and one-half inches in diameter; and there shall be no more than two cracks
longer than eight inches; or any combination thereof.
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
(3) In the remaining areas of the windshield, only those cracks which
jeopardize the integrity of the windshield shall be cause for violation.
C. Every commercial motor vehicle shall have a windshield that meets the
requirements of 49 CFR Part 393.
D.(1) Every school bus registered in this state shall maintain the integrity and
condition of the windshield.
(2) The windshield shall be free of discoloration or damage that would
interfere with the driver's view, not including a two-inch border at the top and a one-
inch border on each side of the windshield or each panel thereof.
(3) The windshield shall not contain a crack exceeding one-fourth inch in
width, if not intersected by any other crack or have any damaged area which can be
covered by a disc three-fourths of an inch in diameter, if not closer than three inches
to any other damaged area.
* * *
§1301. Vehicles without required equipment or in unsafe condition
No person shall drive or move on any highway any motor vehicle, low-speed
vehicle as defined in R.S. 32:1(40)(50), trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, or any
combination thereof, unless the equipment upon any such vehicle is in good working
order and adjustment as required in this Chapter and the vehicle is in such safe
mechanical condition as not to endanger the driver or other occupant or any person
upon the highway. Every motor vehicle, low-speed vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and
pole trailer vehicle registered in this state which is required to be inspected pursuant
to the provisions of this Chapter shall bear a valid safety inspection certificate issued
in the state of Louisiana, except as otherwise provided by this Chapter.
§1302. Inspection Enforcement by officers of the department
A. The Director of Public Safety, members of the State Police and such other
officers and employees of the department as the director may designate, may at any
time upon reasonable cause to believe that a vehicle is unsafe or not equipped as
required by law, or that its equipment is not in proper adjustment or repair, require
the driver of such vehicle to stop and submit such vehicle to an inspection and such
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
test with reference thereto as may be appropriate, and issue a citation to the operator
of such vehicle.
B. In the event such vehicle is found to be in unsafe condition or any
required part or equipment is not present or is not in proper repair and adjustment the
officer shall give a written notice to the driver and shall send a copy to the
department. Said notice shall require that such vehicle be placed in safe condition
and its equipment in proper repair and adjustment specifying the particulars with
reference thereto and that a certificate of inspection and approval be obtained within
5 days.
* * *
§1304. Secretary to require periodical periodic inspection; out of state inspections;
commercial and student transportation vehicles
A.(1) The secretary shall at least once a every other year, but not more
frequently than twice each year, require that every motor vehicle, low-speed vehicle,
trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer registered in this state commercial motor vehicle
registered in this state and required to be inspected pursuant to 49 CFR Part 396,
including Part 396.17 and "Appendix G" thereof, every covered farm vehicle with
a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating exceeding twenty-
six thousand pounds, and every student transportation vehicle registered in this state
and required to be inspected pursuant to LAC 28:CXIII.701(A)(3) and regulations
promulgated by the secretary be inspected and that an official certificate of
inspection and approval be obtained for such vehicle. However, overweight and
oversize mobile homes requiring a state permit shall not be required to bear a
certificate of approved inspection when being moved by a bonded carrier as defined
by law nor shall used motor vehicles in transit by a dealer be required to have a
certificate of inspection and approval.
(2) Such inspection should be made and such certificates obtained with
respect to the mechanism, brakes, and equipment of every vehicle as shall be
designated by the secretary. The secretary shall require the inspection of all
approved automotive emission control devices installed on motor vehicles produced
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
after model year 1980 to insure that such devices are operative and have not been
tampered with. However, low-speed vehicles shall not be subject to regular
emissions inspections
(3)(a) The secretary shall formulate and promulgate a set of standards for the
control and regulation of emission control devices on all automobiles and other
motor vehicles which standards shall be consistent with other federal and state
regulations for the installation and operation of approved emission control devices.
(b) The secretary is hereby authorized to make necessary rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of this Section and to designate
any periods of time during which owners of vehicles, subject to this Section, shall
display upon such vehicles certificates of inspection and approval and shall produce
them on demand of any officer or employee of the department designated by the
secretary or any police or peace officer when authorized by the secretary. However,
an owner or operator of a light trailer, utility trailer, boat trailer, or farm trailer need
only provide a valid inspection sticker on demand of an inspecting officer to be in
compliance with the inspection requirements of this Chapter.
(4) The rules and regulations adopted for the administration and enforcement
of this Section shall include standards for windshields as follows:
(a) In the eight and one-half inch by eleven inch "acute area" directly in the
driver’s line of vision there shall be no cracks and there shall be no more than two
stars, nicks, chips, bullseyes, or half-moons in excess of one-half inch.
(b) In the "critical area" cleaned by the normal sweep of the windshield
wiper blade on the driver's side of the windshield there shall be no star which is
larger than two inches in diameter; there shall be no more than two stars larger than
one and one-half inches in diameter; and there shall be no more than two cracks
longer than eight inches; or any combination thereof.
(c) In the remaining areas of the windshield, only those cracks which
jeopardize the integrity of the windshield shall be cause for rejection.
B. The secretary is hereby authorized to make necessary rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of this Section and to designate
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
any periods of time during which owners of vehicles, subject to this Section, shall
display upon such vehicles certificates of inspection and approval or shall produce
the same on demand of any officer or employee of the department designated by the
secretary or any police or peace officer when authorized by the secretary. Owners
and operators of all motor vehicles, pursuant to this Section, required to be equipped
with windshields shall display on the lower left hand corner of the windshield a
certificate of inspection affixed thereto by a duly authorized motor vehicle inspection
station. The secretary shall accept the certificate of inspection and approval issued
by any municipality pursuant to any municipal ordinance adopted prior to July 27,
1960. However, each person who applies for a motor vehicle inspection tag in the
city of New Orleans shall produce written proof of insurance from an insurer that the
motor vehicle is covered by security and shall declare in writing that he or she
intends to maintain said security at all times while said vehicle is used upon the
highways of Louisiana.
C. The director may authorize the acceptance in this state of a certificate of
inspection and approval issued in another state having an inspection law similar to
this Chapter and may extend the time within which a certificate shall be obtained by
the resident owner of a vehicle which was not in this state during the time an
inspection was required.
D.(1) C. The secretary may suspend the registration of any vehicle which he
determines is in such unsafe condition as to constitute a menace to safety, or which
after notice and demand is not equipped as required in this Chapter, or for which a
required certificate has not been obtained.
E.(1) The mere failure of the owner or operator of a motor vehicle required
by this Section to be inspected to obtain a current and valid inspection certificate
shall not be in violation, provided that the certificate has been expired less than one
calendar month; nor shall an owner or operator be in violation if he shall produce on
demand, under Subsection B of this Section, a certificate of inspection for the vehicle
valid and effective for not more than six months and not in current display on the
windshield by reason of replacement of the windshield glass.
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
D.(2) However, when When a certificate of inspection is removed from a
windshield by reason of replacement of windshield glass, the owner of the vehicle
may be issued, for a fee of five dollars and twenty-five cents and return of the
original certificate to an inspection certificate station, a certificate which shall be
valid for the time remaining on the original certificate.
F. The purchaser of a used vehicle from a private individual shall be
protected from citations for failure to have an inspection tag during the interval
between the date of purchase and the receipt of title, provided proof of application
can be shown.
G. E. In order to enforce the provisions of this Section as applicable to motor
vehicles which are propelled by an internal combustion engine or motor capable of
using liquefied petroleum gas or compressed natural gas, no such vehicle shall be
issued a motor vehicle inspection certificate without a current decal as evidence of
tax payment, as required by R.S. 47:802.3.
H. F. No motor vehicle registered in a parish that approves the fee or charge
authorized by R.S. 32:1306.1 shall be inspected in a parish other than the parish of
registration.
G.(1) In addition, the secretary shall require motor vehicles registered in a
parish or municipality subject to the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq.,
or continuous regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency requiring performance of the inspection and maintenance (I/M)
program, be inspected in accordance with R.S. 30:2054(B)(8). Nothing in this
Section shall be construed to relieve any operator of a motor vehicle, low-speed
vehicle as defined in R.S. 32:1(50), trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, or any
combination thereof from compliance with the provisions of R.S. 32:1301.
(2) The secretary shall require the inspection of all approved automotive
emission control devices installed on vehicles required to be inspected or that were
produced after model year 1980 to ensure that such devices have not been tampered
with and are operative. However, low-speed vehicles shall not be subject to regular
emissions inspections.
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
(3)(a) The secretary shall formulate and promulgate a set of standards for the
control and regulation of emission control devices on all automobiles and other
motor vehicles subject to inspection pursuant to this Section, which standards shall
be consistent with other federal and state regulations for the installation and
operation of approved emission control devices.
(b) The secretary is hereby authorized to make necessary rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of this Section and to designate
any periods of time during which owners of vehicles, subject to this Section, shall
provide external, readily visible certificates of inspection for emissions inspection
and approval or shall produce them on demand of any officer or employee of the
department designated by the secretary or any police or peace officer when
authorized by the secretary.
H. The secretary may authorize the acceptance in this state of a certificate
of inspection and approval issued in another state having an inspection law similar
to this Chapter and may extend the time within which a certificate shall be obtained
by the resident owner of a vehicle which was not in this state during the time an
inspection was required.
§1304.1. Louisiana Vehicle Identification Program
A. The secretary shall require that every motor vehicle or low speed vehicle,
as defined in R.S. 32:1(50), registered in this state bear a Louisiana Vehicle
Identification Program sticker.
B. The Louisiana Vehicle Identification Program sticker shall contain the
vehicle identification number and be visible to law enforcement.
C. The fee for the Louisiana Vehicle Identification Program shall not exceed
six dollars per year and may be assessed and collected on a biennial basis.
D.(1) The secretary is hereby authorized to promulgate necessary rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of this Section and to designate
during which owners of vehicles, subject to this Section, shall display upon such
vehicles program stickers.
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
(2) The rules and regulations adopted for the administration and enforcement
of this Section shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The location to affix the program sticker.
(b) The inclusion of a barcode, quick response code, or comparable
electronic identifier on the sticker.
* * *
§1306. Operation of official inspection stations
* * *
C.(1)(a) A charge or fee shall be charged for each certificate of inspection
and approval issued, as provided in this Subsection.
(b) Persons operating an official inspection station shall offer certificates of
inspection that are valid for both one year and two year periods. The owner of the
vehicle shall have the option of purchasing a one year or a two year certificate. A
charge or fee shall be charged for each year of validity of the certificate of inspection
and approval issued, as provided in this Subsection.
(c) The provisions of Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph shall not apply to
the inspection programs provided for in Paragraphs (3) and (5) of this Subsection and
to student transportation vehicles.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection, for each year of validity
of the certificate issued, a charge or fee of ten dollars shall be charged, four dollars
and seventy-five cents of which shall be retained by the operator of the motor vehicle
inspection station conducting the inspection, four dollars of which shall be
transferred to the office of state police for use in traffic law enforcement, and one
dollar and twenty-five cents shall be transferred to the office of motor vehicles for
expenses associated with the motor vehicle inspection and financial responsibility
programs. Included in the inspection shall be the adjustment of headlights when
needed and mechanically practical, at no additional cost to the operator of the motor
vehicle inspected.
(3)(a) (2)(a) For parishes and municipalities that have a vehicle inspection
and maintenance program required by the federal Clean Air Act or regulations
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, an additional
eight dollars shall be charged for each inspection that includes the performance of
the inspection and maintenance (I/M) program pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
30:2054(B)(8) for 1980 or newer model year motor vehicles. The motor vehicle
inspection station shall retain six dollars of the additional charge for implementation
and performance of the I/M program. Two dollars of the additional charge shall be
transferred to the Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality to implement and
operate the inspection and maintenance program.
(b) The department shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations
necessary to implement the provisions of this Paragraph.
(c) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to any trailer, light
trailer, or semitrailer.
(4) (3) The maintenance and inspection program and the fees provided for
in Paragraph (3) (2) of this Subsection shall be discontinued when the I/M program
is discontinued as allowed by the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., and
regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or
agreements with the agency concerning the implementation of this program, or result
in any other noncompliance regarding this Subsection.
(5) (4) An annual charge or fee of thirty dollars shall be charged for the
inspection of all commercial motor vehicles which are required to be inspected under
the provisions of Part 396 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations 49 CFR
Part 396, including Part 396.17 and "Appendix G" thereof. No charges or fees other
than the thirty-dollar fee shall be charged for a commercial motor vehicle inspection.
Of the thirty-dollar fee, the motor vehicle inspection station operator who performs
this inspection shall retain twenty-three dollars and seventy-five cents; two dollars
and twenty-five cents shall be transferred to the office of motor vehicles for expenses
associated with motor vehicle and financial responsibility programs; and four dollars
of which shall be transferred to the office of state police for use in traffic law
enforcement. Included in the inspection shall be the adjustment of headlights at no
additional cost to the operator of the motor vehicle being inspected. The Legislature
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
of Louisiana hereby declares that a commercial motor vehicle inspection is much
more extensive than the inspection mandated in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection and
that the increase in the fee or charge for the inspection of commercial vehicles is
based on the difference in the two types of inspection.
(6)(a) (5)(a) The charge or fee for the inspection of student transportation
vehicles which are required to be inspected under pursuant to LAC
28:CXIII.701(A)(3) shall be twenty dollars. No charges or fees other than the
twenty-dollar fee shall be charged for a student transportation vehicle inspection. Of
the twenty-dollar fee, the motor vehicle inspection station operator who performs
this inspection shall retain fourteen dollars and seventy-five cents; one dollar and
twenty-five cents shall be transferred to the office of motor vehicles for expenses
associated with motor vehicle and financial responsibility programs; and four dollars
shall be transferred to the office of state police for use in traffic law enforcement.
(b) The adjustment of headlights shall be included in the inspection at no
additional cost to the owner or operator of the school bus being inspected.
(c) The Legislature of Louisiana hereby declares that a student transportation
vehicle inspection is much more extensive than the inspection required of other
motor vehicles and that the increase in the fee or charge for the inspection of student
transportation vehicles is based on the difference in these types of inspections.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 32:707.5(D)(3) and 1303 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 4. The commissioner of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
office of motor vehicles, shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to provide for the implementation of the provisions of this Act
by no later than December 31, 2026, and is authorized to use the emergency rulemaking
process.
Section 5. For the period from June 30, 2026, to January 1, 2027, no law
enforcement officer shall issue citations to any motor vehicle for failing to produce or
display a certificate of inspection.
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1085 ENROLLED
Section 6. For the parishes subject to the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et
seq., or continuous regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection
Agency requiring performance of the inspection and maintenance (I/M) program, this Act
shall take effect if and when the United States Environmental Protection Agency adopts the
proposed State Implementation Plan amendments submitted by the Department of
Environmental Quality. For all other parishes, this Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
Section 7. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof, is held invalid,
such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act which can
be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end the
provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.